District of Columbia statutes.
9-202.08

Disposition of property; use of money received therefrom.

Where title to the street or alley, of which all or part is to be closed, can reasonably be determined to be held by the United States or the District, the Council may dispose of the property to the best advantage of the District and may assess the fair market value of the land and the value of the District’s improvements on the land to the person(s) to whom the title to the land is to vest. Any money received for land where the title was held by the United States shall be deposited in the Treasury of the United States to the credit of the United States. Any money received for land where title was held by the District shall be credited to the General Fund of the District.

Mar. 10, 1983, D.C. Law 4-201, § 208, 30 DCR 148
1981 Ed., § 7-428.